Idaho, session 2025, H0169.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-3408, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-3408. EXPENDITURES -- BUDGET -- FUNDING. (1) There is hereby cre-
ated in the state treasury the Idaho bureau of educational services for the
deaf and the blind trust fund, which is hereby continuously appropriated to
the Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf and the blind. The
fund shall consist of appropriations, fees, grants, gifts or moneys from any
other source. The state treasurer shall invest all idle moneys in the fund
and interest earned on such investments shall be retained by the fund.
(2) On or before the first Monday in July, there shall be held at the
time and place determined by the Idaho bureau of educational services for the
deaf and the blind board, a budget meeting and public hearing upon the pro-
posed budget of the Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf and the
blind. Notice of the budget meeting and public hearing shall be posted at
least ten (10) full days prior to the date of the meeting in at least one (1)
conspicuous place to be determined by the Idaho bureau of educational ser-
vices for the deaf and the blind board of directors. The place, hour and day
of the hearing shall be specified in the notice, as well as the place where
such budget may be examined prior to the hearing. On or before the first Mon-
day in July a budget for the Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf
and the blind shall be agreed upon and approved by the majority of the Idaho
bureau of educational services for the deaf and the blind board of directors.
(3) The Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf and the blind
shall submit its annual appropriation request, as provided for in subsection
(2) of this section, which request shall include the information required
under section 67-3502(1), Idaho Code, to the state superintendent of public
instruction, by no later than the first day of August, for the superinten-
dent's review, approval, and inclusion in the by no later than the last day
of August to be included as part of the overall budget request of the edu-
cational support program. The state superintendent of public instruction
shall disburse any funds appropriated to the Idaho bureau of educational
services for the deaf and the blind trust fund no later than July 1 or as soon
as practicable thereafter. The Idaho bureau of educational services for the
deaf and the blind board of directors shall use such moneys to provide sup-
plemental services to deaf or hard of hearing and blind or visually impaired
students in the state of Idaho.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.